Alaska, session 34, HB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 36.30.540 is amended to read: 06 Sec. 36.30.540. Procurement report. The commissioner shall biennially 07 prepare a report concerning procurements by agencies and notify the legislature that 08 the report is available. The report must include 09 (1) the records maintained by the commissioner under AS 36.30.510 10 and the records maintained under AS 36.30.520(a) for the previous two fiscal years; 11 (2) a list of procurements made under this chapter from out-of-state 12 sources during the previous two fiscal years, together with the total number of 13 procurement contracts entered into during that period with out-of-state contractors and 14 the total value of these contracts; this paragraph does not apply to procurements made 01 under AS 36.30.320; and 02 (3) a list of procurements made under this chapter from state sources 03 during the previous two fiscal years, together with the total number of procurement 04 contracts entered into during that period with state contractors and the total value of 05 these contracts; this paragraph does not apply to procurements made under 06 AS 36.30.320; 07 (4) the total number of procurement contracts entered into during 08 the previous two fiscal years with new businesses in the state, the total value of 09 these contracts, and details on the demographic and geographic areas of these 10 businesses; 11 (5) the percentage of the total number and total value of 12 procurement contracts entered into in the previous two fiscal years that were 13 entered into with new businesses in the state; and 14 (6) recommendations on improving access to procurement 15 contracts for new businesses in the state, including details on new businesses in 16 the state in statistically underrepresented demographic segments and geographic 17 areas of the state. 18 * Sec. 2. AS 36.30.540 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 19 (b) In this section, "new business in the state" has the meaning given in 20 AS 44.33.859. 21 * Sec. 3. AS 44.33 is amended by adding new sections to read: 22 Article 13A. Entrepreneurship. 23 Sec. 44.33.850. Office of entrepreneurship. The office of entrepreneurship is 24 created in the department. 25 Sec. 44.33.853. Duties. (a) The office shall 26 (1) promote innovation-based economic development, business 27 development, and the creation of jobs in emerging sectors; 28 (2) provide a new business in the state with information on available 29 resources and state services and the laws relevant to starting a new business; 30 (3) facilitate engagement between the state and a new business in the 31 state to increase the use of goods and services from state sources; 01 (4) in coordination with community entrepreneurship programs, 02 economic development organizations, local government agencies, military 03 installations, regional development organizations, small business development centers, 04 and the University of Alaska's innovation and technology transfer programs, 05 (A) identify and address the needs of a new business in the 06 state; 07 (B) facilitate communication to enhance the range and quality 08 of services of a new business in the state; 09 (C) streamline the delivery of services of a new business in the 10 state; and 11 (D) share data and information with a new business in the state; 12 and 13 (5) actively seek and use volunteers to assist in the performance of the 14 duties described in this section. 15 (b) If requested by a borough, city, or municipality, the office shall assist in 16 the development and training of a business ecosystem liaison position in the borough, 17 city, or municipality for the purpose of improving the delivery of services of a small 18 business in the state and interactions among small businesses in the state, other 19 businesses, and the state. 20 (c) The department may provide to the office facilities to implement the duties 21 described under this section. If the department determines that facilities are not 22 necessary to perform a duty of the office, the office shall perform the duty using 23 electronic or telephonic means. 24 (d) In this section, 25 (1) "department" means the Department of Commerce, Community, 26 and Economic Development; 27 (2) "military installation" has the meaning given in AS 14.03.080(g); 28 (3) "regional development organization" means a nonprofit 29 organization or nonprofit corporation formed to encourage economic development 30 within a particular region of the state that includes the entire area of each municipality 31 within that region and that has a board of directors that represents the region's 01 economic, political, and social interests. 02 Sec. 44.33.855. Annual report. On or before January 1 of each year, the office 03 shall prepare a report detailing legislation enacted in the previous year that supports, 04 hinders, or otherwise affects new businesses in the state. The office shall submit the 05 report to the governor, senate secretary, and chief clerk of the house of representatives 06 and notify the legislature that the report is available. 07 Sec. 44.33.857. New state business development. (a) Subject to 08 appropriation, each fiscal year, state agencies shall collectively expend an amount 09 equal to five percent of the total amount appropriated for economic development 10 programs related to business growth or diversification in emerging sectors in a fiscal 11 year for the support and expansion of organizations or programs that provide services 12 to new businesses in the state. 13 (b) A state agency shall notify the office of the expenditure of funds under this 14 section. The notification must include the amount of the expenditure and identify the 15 organization or program that received the funds. 16 Sec. 44.33.859. Definitions. In AS 44.33.850 - 44.33.859, 17 (1) "new business in the state" means a business that qualifies as an 18 Alaska bidder as defined in AS 36.30.990 and has been in operation for less than five 19 years; 20 (2) "office" means the office of entrepreneurship; 21 (3) "state agency" means a department, institution, board, commission, 22 division, authority, public corporation, committee, or other administrative unit of the 23 executive branch of state government. 24 * Sec. 4. AS 36.30.540(a)(4), 36.30.540(a)(5), 36.30.540(a)(6), 36.30.540(b); AS 44.33.850, 25 44.33.853, 44.33.855, 44.33.857, and 44.33.859 are repealed. 26 * Sec. 5. Section 4 of this Act takes effect December 31, 2030. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.